Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 4. Inherited Enzymatic Disorder Coverage

Effective dates. —

Laws 2015, ch. 94, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2015.

§ 26-20-401.
Inherited enzymatic disorder coverage required.

All individual and group health insurance policies providing coverage on an expense incurred basis, individual and group service or indemnity type contracts issued by any insurer including any nonprofit corporation and individual and group service contracts issued by a health maintenance organization or delivered on or after July 1, 2013, shall provide coverage for the equipment, supplies and outpatient self-management training and education, including medical nutrition therapy for the treatment of inherited enzymatic disorders caused by single gene defects involved in the metabolism of amino, organic and fatty acids if prescribed by a health care professional legally authorized to prescribe such items under law. Covered inherited enzymatic disorder outpatient self-management training and education shall be provided by a certified, registered or licensed health care professional with expertise in inherited enzymatic disorders. For purposes of this section, required covered outpatient self-management training and education shall be limited to:

A one (1) time evaluation and training program when medically necessary, within one (1) year of diagnosis;

Additional medically necessary self-management training shall be provided upon a significant change in symptoms, condition or treatment.

For purposes of this section, “inherited enzymatic disorders” includes and is limited to phenylketonuria, maternal phenylketonuria, maple syrup urine disease, tyrosinemia, homocystinuria, histidinemia, urea cycle disorders, hyperlysinemia, glutaric acidemias, methylmalonic acidemia and propionic acidemia.

The benefits provided under this section shall be subject to the same annual deductibles or coinsurance established for all other covered benefits within a given policy. Private third party payors may not refuse, reduce or eliminate coverage due to the requirements of this section. Enforcement of this section shall be performed by the commissioner or his designee.

This section shall apply to both public and private health benefit plans, as defined in W.S. 26-1-102(a)(xxxiii) and (xxxiv), delivered or issued on or after July 1, 2013.

Repealed by Laws 2020, ch. 87, § 3.

History:

2013 ch. 112, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 20, § 1, effective March 4, 2014; 2020 ch. 87, § 3, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2014 amendment

added (e).

Laws 2014, ch. 20, § 3, makes this act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2014.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, repealed (e), which read “Nothing in subsection (d) of this section shall be construed as limiting the introduction of any other competent evidence bearing upon the question of whether or not the defendant was under the influence of alcohol. The fact that any person charged with a violation of subsection (c) of this section is or has been entitled to use the controlled substance under the laws of this state shall not constitute a defense against any charge under this section. It is an affirmative defense to a violation of paragraph (c)(iii) of this section that the defendant consumed a sufficient quantity of alcohol after the time of actual operation or physical control of a watercraft and before the administration of the evidentiary test to cause the defendant's alcohol concentration to exceed eight one-hundredths of one percent (0.08%) if the watercraft is a motorboat, but evidence of the consumption may not be admitted unless notice is given to the prosecution pursuant to Rule 12.1 of the Wyoming Rules of Criminal Procedure.”